District of Columbia statutes.
18-303

General devise and bequest of all property.

A devise and bequest purporting to be of all real or personal property, or both, belonging to the testator, includes also all property of either or both kinds, respectively, over which he has a general power of appointment, unless a contrary intention appears in the testamentary instrument containing the devise or bequest.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 688, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 18-303.
1973 Ed., § 18-303.